Utah statutes.
61-2e-301.   Use of licensed or certified appraisers.

(1)  An appraisal management company required to be registered under this chapter may not enter into an agreement with an appraiser for the performance of a real estate appraisal activity unless the appraiser is licensed or certified in good standing pursuant to Chapter 2b, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act.

(2) (a)  An appraisal management company required to be registered under this chapter shall have a system to verify that an individual added to the appraiser panel of the appraisal management company holds a license or certificate in good standing in this state pursuant to Chapter 2b, Real Estate Appraiser Licensing and Certification Act.

(b)  As part of the registration process under Part 2, Registration, an appraisal management company shall biennially provide an explanation of the system described in Subsection (2)(a) in the form prescribed by the division.

